Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.045

Escapees—Arrest warrants.

The secretary or the secretary's designee shall issue arrest warrants for juveniles who escape from department residential custody. The secretary or the secretary's designee may issue arrest warrants for juveniles who abscond from parole supervision or fail to meet conditions of parole. These arrest warrants shall authorize any law enforcement, probation and parole, or peace officer of this state, or any other state where the juvenile is located, to arrest the juvenile and to place the juvenile in physical custody pending the juvenile's return to confinement in a state juvenile rehabilitation facility.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 607; 1997 c 338 s 14; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 518.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.